Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 6
LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION

2-2-601 and 2-2-602. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part repealed, p. 2106, § 5, effective June 9.

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added in 1988 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1993. For the text of this part 6 prior to 1993, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions concerning the former legislative commission, now called the executive committee, are now located in part 3 of article 3 of this title.